North Carolina, session 2025, HB689.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 116-143.1 is amended by adding the following new subsections
to read:
"(n) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a person who meets all of the
following qualifications shall be eligible to be charged the in-State tuition rate:
(1) The person graduated and received a high school diploma from a school
within North Carolina that is not a nonpublic residential school.
(2) The person enrolled in the institution of higher education in the school year
immediately following his or her graduation and receipt of a high school
diploma.
(3) The person attended North Carolina public or nonpublic schools for a
minimum of four consecutive years immediately prior to high school
graduation and receipt of a high school diploma.
(4) The person holds an unexpired North Carolina drivers license or special
identification card issued under G.S. 20-37.7.
(5) The person has received a social security number and card from the United
States Social Security Administration.
*H689-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
This subsection does not make a person a resident of North Carolina for any other purpose.
(o) A person who is eligible to be charged the in-State tuition rate as provided in
subsection (n) of this section shall provide evidence of his or her unexpired North Carolina
drivers license or special identification card at the beginning of each semester of enrollment to
continue to be eligible to be charged the in-State tuition rate.
(p) Any information obtained as part of the process of applying for the in-State tuition
rate pursuant to subsection (n) or (o) of this section shall be confidential and is not a public
record."
SECTION 2. G.S. 116-143.4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 116-143.4. Admissions status of persons charged in-State tuition.
(a) A person eligible for the in-State tuition rate pursuant to this Article shall be
considered an in-State applicant for the purpose of admission; provided that, admission.
However, a person eligible for in-State tuition pursuant to G.S. 116-143.3(c) shall be considered
an in-State applicant for the purpose of admission only if at the time of seeking admission he the
person is enrolled in a high school located in North Carolina or enrolled in an adult high school
equivalency diploma program in an institution located in this State.
(b) A person eligible for the in-State tuition rate pursuant to G.S. 116-143.1(n) shall not
be considered an in-State applicant for the purposes of admission to a constituent institution of
The University of North Carolina."
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 academic year.
Page 2 House Bill 689-First Edition